Hawaii, session 2025, SB611.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The Hawaii Revised Statutes is amended by adding a new chapter to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "Chapter FIREWORKS §   -1  Title. This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Revised Fireworks Control Law". §   -2  Definitions.  As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise: "Aerial device" means any fireworks containing one hundred thirty milligrams or less of explosive materials that produces an audible or visible effect and is designed to rise into the air and explode or detonate in the air or to fly about above the ground.  "Aerial devices" classified as fireworks under UN0336 and UN0337 by the United States Department of Transportation as set forth in Title 49 Code of Federal Regulations include firework items commonly known as bottle rockets, sky rockets, missile-type rockets, helicopters, torpedoes, daygo bombs, roman candles, flying pigs, and jumping jacks that move about the ground farther than a circle with a radius of twelve feet as measured from the point where the item was placed and ignited, aerial shells, and mines. "Articles pyrotechnic" means pyrotechnic devices for professional use similar to consumer fireworks in chemical composition and construction but not intended for consumer use that meet the weight limits for consumer fireworks but are not labeled as such, and that are classified as UN0431 or UN0432 by the United States Department of Transportation. "Consumer fireworks" means any fireworks designed primarily for retail sale to the public during authorized dates and times, that produces visible or audible effects by combustion, and that is designed to remain on or near the ground and, while stationary or spinning rapidly on or near the ground, emits smoke, a shower of colored sparks, whistling effects, flitter sparks, or balls of colored sparks, and includes combination items that contain one or more of these effects. "Consumer fireworks" comply with the construction, chemical composition, and labeling regulations of the United States Consumer Product Safety Commission as set forth in Title 16 Code of Federal Regulations and fireworks classified as UN0336 and UN0337 by the United States Department of Transportation as set forth in Title 49 Code of Federal Regulations.  "Consumer fireworks" include firework items commonly known as firecrackers that are single paper cylinders not exceeding one and one-half inches in length excluding the fuse and one-quarter of an inch in diameter and contain a charge of not more than fifty milligrams of pyrotechnic composition, snakes, sparklers, fountains, and cylindrical or cone fountains that emit effects up to a height not greater than twelve feet above the ground, illuminating torches, bamboo cannons, whistles, toy smoke devices, wheels, and ground spinners that when ignited remain within a circle with a radius of twelve feet as measured from the point where the item was placed and ignited, novelty or trick items, combination items, and other fireworks of like construction that are designed to produce the same or similar effects. "Cultural" means relating to the arts, customs, traditions, mores, and history of all of the various ethnic groups of Hawaii. "Display" means the use of aerial devices, display fireworks, or articles pyrotechnic for any activity, including such activities as movie or television production. "Display fireworks" means any fireworks designed primarily for exhibition display by producing visible or audible effects and classified as display fireworks or contained in the regulations of the United States Department of Transportation and designated as UN0333, UN0334, or UN0335, and includes salutes containing more than two grains (one hundred and thirty milligrams) of explosive materials, aerial shells containing more than forty grams of pyrotechnic compositions, and other display pieces which exceed the limits of explosive materials for classification as "consumer fireworks".  This term also includes fused setpieces containing components, which together exceed fifty milligrams of salute power. "Fireworks" means any combustible or explosive composition, or any substance or combination of substances, or article prepared for the purpose of producing a visible or audible effect by combustion, explosion, deflagration, or detonation and that meets the definition of aerial device or consumer or display fireworks as defined by this section and contained in the regulations of the United States Department of Transportation as set forth in Title 49 Code of Federal Regulations.  "Fireworks" does not include any explosives or pyrotechnics regulated under chapter 396, automotive safety flares, toy pistols, toy cannons, toy guns, party poppers, pop‑its, or other devices that contain twenty-five hundredths of a grain or less of explosive substance. "Import" (and any nounal, verbal, adjectival, adverbial, and other equivalent form of the term used interchangeably in this chapter) means to bring or attempt to bring fireworks into the State or to cause fireworks to be brought into the State, and includes fireworks labeled or designated as samples, even if not intended for retail sale. "License" means a nontransferable, formal authorization, valid for a period not to exceed one calendar year from the date of issuance and which the department is hereby authorized to issue under this chapter, to engage in the act or acts specifically designated herein. "Movie" or "television production" means a series of activities that are directly related to the creation of visual and cinematic imagery to be delivered via film, videotape, or digital media and are to be sold, distributed, or displayed as entertainment or the advertisement of products for mass public consumption, including scripting, casting, set design and construction, transportation, videography, photography, sound recording, interactive game design, and post production. "Permanent" means the state of one object being affixed to another object by glue or other means in a manner that the affixed object is intended to not be easily removable. "Permanent fireworks storage building or structure" means a building or structure affixed to a foundation on a site and having fixed utility connections, which is intended to remain on the site for more than one hundred eighty consecutive calendar days in a twelve-month period for the purpose of receiving, storing, or shipping fireworks, but in which no manufacturing of fireworks is performed. "Pyrotechnic composition" or "pyrotechnic contents" means the combustible or explosive component of fireworks. "Temporary fireworks storage building or structure" means a building or structure that is used for fireworks storage for one hundred eighty days or less in a twelve-month period. §   -3 Permissible uses of consumer fireworks.  Consumer fireworks may be set off, ignited, discharged, or otherwise caused to explode within the State only: (1)  From 9:00 p.m. on New Year's Eve to 1:00 a.m. on New Year's Day; from 7:00 a.m. to 7:00 p.m. on Chinese New Year's Day; and from 1:00 p.m. to 9:00 p.m. on the Fourth of July; or (2)  From 9:00 a.m. to 9:00 p.m. for a cultural use; provided that the purchase of not more than five thousand individual consumer fireworks commonly known as firecrackers shall be allowed by any individual. §   -4 Certain fireworks; prohibited.  It shall be unlawful for any person to possess; store; set off, ignite, or otherwise cause to explode; import; sell; offer to sell; purchase; or offer to purchase: (1)  Aerial devices; (2)  Articles pyrotechnic; or (3)  Display fireworks, for any purpose, whether personal or commercial. § -5  General prohibitions.  (a)  It shall be unlawful for any person to: (1)  Remove or extract the pyrotechnic contents from any fireworks; (2)  Throw any ignited fireworks: (A)  From, at, or into a vehicle; (B)  At a person or an animal; and (C)  From above the first floor of any building; or (3)  Set off, ignite, discharge, or otherwise cause to explode any fireworks: (A)  Above the first floor of any building; (B)  In any vehicle; (C)  At any time not within the periods for use prescribed in section    -3; (D)  Within one thousand feet of any operating hospital, licensed convalescent home, licensed home for the elderly, zoo, licensed animal shelter, or licensed animal hospital; (E)  In any school building, or on any school grounds and yards without first obtaining authorization from appropriate school officials; (F)  On any highway, alley, street, sidewalk, or other public way; in any park; on any public beach; in any officially designated forest or wildlife preserve; within fifty feet of a canefield; or within one thousand feet of any building used for public worship during the periods when services are held; and (G)  Within five hundred feet of any hotel. (b)  It shall be unlawful to purchase consumer fireworks more than five calendar days before the time periods for permissible use under section    -3. (c)  It shall be unlawful to sell consumer fireworks after 12:01 a.m. on New Year's Day, 6:00 p.m. on Chinese New Year's Day, and 8:00 p.m. on the Fourth of July. §   -6 Exceptions.  (a)  The prohibitions in section    -5 shall not apply to: (1)  The use of flares, noisemakers, or signals for warning, pest control, or illumination purposes by police and fire departments, utility companies, transportation agencies, and other governmental or private agencies or persons, including agricultural operations, in connection with emergencies, their duties, or business; (2)  The sale or use of blank cartridges for a show or theater, or for signal, commercial, or institutional purposes in athletics or sports; (3)  The purchase and use of consumer fireworks in a movie, television production, or theatrical production; and (4)  The testing, disposal, or destruction of illegal fireworks by an agency with authority to enforce this chapter. (b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to apply to the possession, storage, sale, or use of explosives and combustibles in accordance with chapter 396. §   -7 Licenses required. A person shall not import or sell, offer to sell, or store for sale, consumer fireworks, unless the person has a valid license issued by the county. §   -8 Application for license.  (a) All licenses required under section -7 shall be issued by the county and shall be nontransferable.  Licenses to import shall specify the date of issuance or effect and the date of expiration, which shall be March 31 of each year.  The application shall be made on a form setting forth the date upon which the importations are to begin, the address of the location of the importer, and the name of the proprietor or, if a partnership, the name of the partnership and the names of all partners or, if a corporation, the name of the corporation and the names of its officers.  If the state fire council or county discovers at a later date that a licensee has been convicted of a felony under this chapter, the licensee's license shall be revoked and no new license shall be issued to the licensee for two years. (b)  Each storage, wholesaling, and retailing site shall be required to obtain a separate license. The license shall specify the date of issuance or effect and the date of expiration, which shall be March 31 of each year.  The application shall be made on a form setting forth the date upon which the storage, sale, or offers for sale are to begin, the address of the location of the licensee, and the name of the proprietor, or, if a partnership, the name of the partnership and the names of all partners or, if a corporation, the name of the corporation and the name of its officers.  Any license issued pursuant to this chapter may be revoked by the county if the licensee violates any provision of this chapter or if the licensee stores or handles the consumer fireworks in such a manner as to present an unreasonable safety hazard. (c)  Permanent and temporary fireworks storage buildings or structures and buildings or facilities where redistribution activities are performed shall comply with the currently adopted county building or fire codes or the latest edition of nationally recognized standards. (d)  Any license issued pursuant to this chapter shall be prominently displayed in public view at each licensed location. §   -9 Requirements of licensee.  (a) Any person who has obtained a license under section    -7 and ships consumer fireworks into the State shall: (1)  Clearly state the contents of the shipment on the bill of lading or shipping manifest with specificity; (2)  Declare on the bill of lading or shipping manifest the gross weight of consumer fireworks to be imported in each shipment and the location of the storage facility, if applicable, in which the consumer fireworks are to be stored; (3)  Prior to shipment and when booking each shipment of consumer fireworks, notify the appropriate county official as determined by the county regarding whether the shipment will be distributed from: (A)  Pier to pier; (B)  Pier to warehouse or storage facility; or (C)  Pier to redistribution; (4)  Prior to booking the shipment, provide to the applicable county fire chief: (A)  Written documentation regarding any cultural use event and related contact information to allow the fire chief to validate the cultural use event; and (B)  An inventory breakdown for each cultural use event; and (5)  At the time shipping is booked, the importer or consignee shall notify the appropriate county official as determined by the county in writing of the expected shipment's landing date. (b)  The fire department of a county, in which a shipment of consumer fireworks has landed and becomes subject to the jurisdiction of the fire department, shall be allowed to inspect, if it chooses, any shipment declared on the shipping manifest as consumer fireworks. (c)  The facility in which consumer fireworks are to be stored shall: (1)  Have received approval fifteen days prior to the shipment's arrival from the appropriate county fire department; and (2)  Meet all state and county fire and safety codes. (d)  Any consumer fireworks landed in the State shall be subject to seizure and forfeiture if: (1)  The importer or consignee does not have in the importer's or consignee's possession a valid license to import consumer fireworks under section    -7; (2)  The consignee does not have a valid license to store consumer fireworks under section -7; or (3)  The consumer fireworks have not been declared or have been misdeclared in violation of subsection (a). (e)  No person holding a retailer license to sell consumer fireworks shall be allowed to sell consumer fireworks commonly known as firecrackers in a packet size larger than five thousand individual units.  Any person violating this subsection shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. (f)  Any person violating subsection (a), (c), or (d) shall be subject to the following for shipments of consumer fireworks of: (1)  Twenty-five pounds or less gross weight shall be a petty misdemeanor; (2)  More than twenty-five pounds to three hundred pounds gross weight shall be a misdemeanor; (3)  More than three hundred pounds to ten thousand pounds gross weight shall be a class C felony; and (4)  More than ten thousand pounds gross weight shall be a class B felony. §   -10 Fee for licensees. (a)  The fee for the license required under section    -7 shall be $3,000 for importers, $2,000 for each wholesaler's site, $1,000 for each storage site, and $500 for each retailer's site for each year or fraction of a year in which the licensee plans to conduct business and shall be payable to the county.  The license fees shall be used solely by each county fire department to pay for the salary of an auditor of consumer fireworks records and all expenses incurred to fulfill the duties required, including the inspection of inventory and storage facilities, maintenance of required records, and the training of the auditor.  The auditor of consumer fireworks records shall monitor strict inventory and recordkeeping requirements to ensure that sales of consumer fireworks are made only by persons licensed pursuant to this chapter.  The auditor of consumer fireworks records shall submit an annual report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session detailing the inventory, recordkeeping, and sales of consumer fireworks to license holders.  The county shall provide an exemption from the fees under this section to nonprofit community groups for the importation and storage of consumer fireworks for cultural use events once a year. (b)  The fee for the license required under section    -7 shall be the fee specified in subsection (a) for each year, fraction of a year, or cultural use event in which the licensee plans to conduct business and shall be payable to the county in which the cultural use event is to occur. §   -11 Minors; prohibitions. It shall be unlawful for any person to sell, offer for sale, or give any consumer fireworks to any minor, or for any minor to possess, purchase, sell, or set off, ignite, or otherwise cause to explode any consumer fireworks except as provided in section    -12. §   -12 Liability of parents or guardians.  Any parent, guardian, or other person having the custody or control of any minor, who knowingly permits the minor to possess, purchase, or set off, ignite, or otherwise cause to explode any fireworks or articles pyrotechnic, shall be deemed to be in violation of this chapter and shall be subject to the penalties thereunder, except that the parents or guardian may allow the minor to use consumer fireworks while under the immediate supervision and control of the parent or guardian, or under the supervision and control of another adult. §   -13 Penalty. (a)  Any person who: (1)  Imports aerial devices, display fireworks, or articles pyrotechnic shall be guilty of a class C felony; (2)  Purchases, possesses, sets off, ignites, or discharges aerial devices, display fireworks, or articles pyrotechnic, or stores, sells, or possesses aerial devices, display fireworks, or articles pyrotechnic, or allows an individual to possess, set off, ignite, or otherwise cause to explode any aerial device in violation of section    -14: (A)  If the total weight of the aerial devices, display fireworks, or articles pyrotechnic is twenty-five pounds or more, shall be guilty of a class C felony; or (B)  If the total weight of the aerial devices, display fireworks, or articles pyrotechnic is less than twenty-five pounds, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor; (3)  Transfers or sells aerial devices, display fireworks, or articles pyrotechnic shall be guilty of a class C felony; or (4)  Removes or extracts the pyrotechnic contents from any fireworks or articles pyrotechnic and uses the contents to construct fireworks, articles pyrotechnic, or a fireworks or articles pyrotechnic related device shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. (b) Except as provided in subsection (a) or as otherwise specifically provided for in this chapter, any person who violates any other provision of this chapter, shall be fined no more than $5,000 for each violation.  Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in this section, any person who violates section    -14 shall be fined at least $500 and no more than $5,000. (c)  The court shall collect the fines imposed in subsections (a) and (b) for violations of this chapter and, of the fine proceeds collected, shall pay twenty per cent to the State, and eighty per cent to the county in which the fine was imposed and expended by the county for law enforcement purposes. (d)  Notwithstanding any penalty set forth herein, violations of subsection (a)(1) or (3) may be subject to nuisance abatement proceedings provided in part V of chapter 712. §   -14 Liability of homeowner, renter, or person otherwise responsible for real property.  A homeowner, renter, or person otherwise responsible for the real property who intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly allows an individual, while on the real property, to possess, set off, ignite, or otherwise cause to explode any aerial device shall be deemed to be in violation of this chapter and shall be subject to the penalties specified in section -13(a)(2) and (b). §   -15 Notice requirements.  Each licensed retail outlet shall post adequate notice that clearly cautions each person purchasing fireworks of the prohibitions, liabilities, and penalties incorporated in sections    -11,    -12, and -13. §   -16  County ordinances.  (a)  Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to supersede or in any manner affect a county fireworks ordinance; provided that the ordinance is at least as stringent in the control or prohibition of fireworks as the law under this chapter. (b)  Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a county from enacting ordinances that are more stringent in the control or prohibition of fireworks than this chapter. §   -17  Enforcement; probable cause for arrest.  (a) This chapter shall be enforced by each county.  The counties are authorized to enforce and administer the provisions of this chapter. (b) Arrests for offenses under this chapter or under a county fireworks ordinance shall be made in compliance with chapter 803.  The facts and circumstances to establish probable cause for an arrest may include but are not limited to: (1)  Statements from individuals who witnessed the offense, even if those individuals are not law enforcement officers; and (2)  Photographs, video recordings, or other recordings that show the commission of the offense and can be authenticated by one or more witnesses; provided that a recording made using an unmanned aerial vehicle shall be exempt from the requirement of authentication by one or more witnesses. (c) For the purposes of this section: "Other recording" means any image or series of images. "Unmanned aerial vehicle" means any aerial vehicle that is operated without the possibility of direct human intervention within or on the aerial vehicle.  "Unmanned aerial vehicle" does not include a remote-controlled airplane. §   -18  Health care facilities; report of fireworks and articles pyrotechnic incidents.  (a) Each health care facility in this State shall report all incidents of serious injuries and fatalities caused by legal and illegal fireworks or articles pyrotechnic to the department of health and the police department of the county in which the person was attended or treated.  Each reports shall be in writing or in the manner specified by the department of health. (b)  As used in this section, "health care facility" includes any outpatient clinic, emergency room, or physician's office, private or public, whether organized for profit or not, used, operated, or designed to provide medical diagnosis, treatment, nursing, rehabilitative, or preventive care to any person or persons. "Health care facility" includes health care facilities that are commonly referred to as hospitals, extended care and rehabilitation centers, nursing homes, skilled nursing facilities, intermediate care facilities, hospices for the terminally ill that require licensure or certification by the department of health, kidney disease treatment centers, including freestanding hemodialysis units, outpatient clinics, organized ambulatory health care facilities, emergency care facilities and centers, home health agencies, health maintenance organizations, and others providing similarly organized services regardless of nomenclature." SECTION 2.  Section 712-1270, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§712-1270  Places used to commit offenses against public health and morals or other offenses, a nuisance.  Every building, premises, or place used for the purpose of violating: (1)  Those laws pertaining to offenses against public health and morals contained in this chapter, except offenses under part IV that do not involve the manufacture or distribution of drugs and activities under part III that involve only social gambling as defined in section 712-1231(a); (2)  Section [132D-14(a)(1)]    -13(a)(1) or (3); or (3)  Any offense under part II of chapter 708 that involves a person unlawfully residing on or otherwise occupying real property to which the person has no title, lease, or other legal claim, and every building, premises, or place in or upon which violations of any of the laws set forth in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) are held or occur, is a nuisance that shall be enjoined, abated, and prevented, regardless of whether it is a public or private nuisance." SECTION 3.  Section 712-1270.3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§712-1270.3  Citizen's rights.  Any citizen who brings a nuisance abatement suit against a place used for the purpose of committing: (1)  Fireworks related offenses contained in section [132D-14(a)(1)]    -13(a)(1) or (3); or (2)  Drug offenses under part IV of this chapter or who files a complaint with the local police or drug nuisance abatement unit of the department of the attorney general, shall be entitled to the same rights and protections of victims and witnesses in criminal proceedings in accordance with chapter 801D." SECTION 4.  Section 712-1281, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§712-1281  Forfeiture; fireworks.[]]  In addition to any other penalty that may be imposed for violation of section [132D-14(a)(1)]    -13(a)(1) or (3), any property used or intended for use in the commission of, attempt to commit, or conspiracy to commit an offense under section [132D-14(a)(1)]       -13(a)(1) or (3), or that facilitated or assisted such activity, and any proceeds or other property acquired or maintained with the proceeds from violation of section [132D-14(a)(1)]      -13(a)(1) or (3) may be subject to forfeiture pursuant to chapter 712A." SECTION 5. Chapter 132D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is repealed. SECTION 6. All rules, policies, procedures, guidelines, and other material adopted or developed by any state or county agency before the effective date of this Act to implement provisions of the Hawaii Revised Statutes repealed or amended by this Act shall remain in full force and effect, to the extent the new provisions of the Hawaii Revised Statutes established by this Act are substantively similar to the repealed or amended provisions of the Hawaii Revised Statutes.  Rules, policies, procedures, guidelines, and other material remaining in effect pursuant to this section may be amended, repealed, or rescinded pursuant to applicable law. SECTION 7. This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 8. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 9. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________